Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 07. Warehouse Receipts, Bills of Lading, and Other Documents of Title.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.05.532

—

45.05.611

.
Renumbered in 1980. To determine the former number of a particular section, see the Tables of Sections Amended in volume 11.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 115(a), ch. 44, SLA 2009, provides that the amendments made by ch. 44, SLA 2009, apply “to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises on or after January 1, 2010” and do “not apply to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises before January 1, 2010, even if the document of title or bailment would be subject to [ch. 44, SLA 2009] if the document of title was issued or the bailment arose on or after January 1, 2010.”
Section 115(b), ch. 44, SLA 2009 provides that ch. 44, SLA 2009, “does not apply to a right of action that has accrued before January 1, 2010.”
Section 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, provides that “document of title issued or a bailment that arises before January 1, 2010, and the rights, obligations, and interests flowing from that document or bailment are governed by a statute amended or repealed by [ch. 44, SLA 2009] as if the amendment or repeal had not occurred and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced under that statute.”